New York, session 2025-2026, S9175.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 1662-e of the vehicle and traffic 2 law is amended by adding a new paragraph (v) to read as follows: 3 (v) within the area known as West Hempstead of the town consisting of 4 the following roadways: 5 (a) Bedell Terrace; and 6 (b) Woodlawn Road. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14715-01-6